Massachusetts, session 194th, H415.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary in the General Laws Chapter
32 insert after section 23
"SECTION XXXX. The purchase and/or consumption by any and all consumers and
entities in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts of any and all product made in Russia is banned
henceforth commencing immediately upon passage of this bill."
of 1